Ohio, session 136, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3702.35 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 3702.35. (A) As used in this section : 5
(1) "Commission for the accreditation of birth centers" 6
means the organization known by that name or its successor 7
organization. 8
(2) "Freestanding birthing center" means a facility, or 9
part of a facility, that provides care during pregnancy, 10
delivery, and the immediate postpartum period to a low-risk 11
expectant mother. "Freestanding birthing center" does not 12
include a hospital licensed under Chapter 3722. of the Revised 13
Code. 14
(B) Each freestanding birthing center shall have a written 15
plan for the transfer of a mother or a newborn to a hospital in 16
the event of medical complications, emergency situations, or as 17
the need arises. 18

S. B. No. 140 Page 2
As Introduced
(C) No freestanding birthing center accredited by the 19
commission for the accreditation of birth centers shall be 20
required to establish a written transfer agreement with a 21
hospital. 22
(D) A freestanding birthing center that is not accredited 23
by the commission for the accreditation of birth centers shall 24
have a written transfer agreement with a local hospital. 25